Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SAFE ROUTES TO SCHOOL
SECTION 1.  ORS 184.742 is amended to read:
184.742. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission may provide  matching grants under this
section for safety improvement projects near schools.
(2) To qualify for a matching grant an applicant shall:
(a) Demonstrate that  a project fits within the applicable plan developed pursuant to ORS
195.115;
(b) Provide a cash match of at least 40 percent of the project’s costs; and
(c) Provide any other information required by the commission.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section,  by rule,  the commission may reduce the
amount the applicant must provide for a cash match.  [ An applicant providing a reduced cash match
shall provide at least 20 percent of the project’s costs. This subsection applies if: ]
[(a) The school is located in a city with a population of 5,000 or fewer; ]
[(b) The project reduces  hazards within a safety corridor, as defined by the commission by rule;
or]
[(c) The school site qualifies  for assistance under Chapter I of Title I of the federal Elementary
and Secondary Education Act of 1965. ]
(4) The commission shall prioritize the  expenditure of funds as authorized under this section for
projects that are located within a [ one-mile] two-mile  radius  of a school that serves students in
prekindergarten, kindergarten or  grades 1 through [ 8] 12 , or any combination of those grade
levels[, or a school that serves students in kindergarten through grade 12 ].
(5) The matching  grants shall be used to reduce barriers and hazards to children walking or
bicycling to and from school, including but not limited to safety improvement projects that:
(a) Improve sidewalks;
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 1
(b) Reduce vehicle speeds;
(c) Improve pedestrian and bicycle crossings; or
(d) Create or improve bicycle lanes.
(6) The commission may adopt rules specifying the application process and the selection  criteria
that will be used in awarding matching grants.
CONNECT OREGON
SECTION 2.
 ORS 367.081 is amended to read:
367.081. (1) Each biennium, the Department of Transportation may provide  grants for transpor-
tation projects under ORS 367.080 only if the department determines that $50 million or  more will
be available in the Connect  Oregon Fund for [ the biennium in which the grants are provided ] grants
awarded under ORS 367.080 to 367.086.
(2) The department may use up to one percent of the amounts  available within the Connect
Oregon Fund to pay administrative costs incurred by the department in carrying  out the provisions
of ORS 367.080 to 367.086.
(3) Each biennium, the department shall transfer seven percent of the moneys  in the Connect
Oregon Fund to the Multimodal Active  Transportation Fund established under ORS 367.091 for the
purpose of providing grants for bicycle and pedestrian transportation projects.
USE FUEL
SECTION 3.  ORS 319.550 is amended to read:
319.550. (1) Except as provided in this section, a person may not use  fuel in a motor vehicle in
this state unless the person holds a valid user’s license.
(2) A nonresident may use fuel in a motor vehicle not registered in Oregon for a period not
exceeding 30  consecutive days without obtaining a user’s license or the emblem  issued under ORS
319.600, if, for all fuel used in a motor vehicle in this state, the nonresident pays to a seller,  at the
time of the sale, the tax provided in ORS 319.530.
(3) A user’s  license is not required for a person who uses fuel in a motor vehicle [ with a com-
bined weight  of 26,000 pounds or less ] if, for all fuel used in a motor vehicle in this state, the person
pays to a seller, at the time of the sale, the tax provided in ORS 319.530.
(4) A user’s license is not required for a person who is subject to the weight-mile tax
described in ORS 825.474 and 825.476 or the flat fee rate described in ORS 825.480.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a)  A user’s license is not required for a person who uses fuel as described in  ORS
319.520 (7) in the vehicles  specified in this subsection if the person pays to a seller, at the time of
the sale, the tax provided in ORS 319.530.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection applies to the following vehicles:
(A) Motor homes as defined in ORS 801.350.
(B) Recreational vehicles as defined in ORS 174.101.
[(5)] (6) A user’s license is not required for a person who uses fuel in a motor vehicle:
(a) Metered use by which is subject to the per-mile road usage charge  imposed under ORS
319.885; and
(b) That also uses fuels subject to ORS 319.510 to 319.880.
[(6)] (7) A user’s license is not required for a person who  uses fuel in a motor vehicle on which
an emblem issued for the motor vehicle pursuant to ORS 319.535 is displayed.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 319.520 is amended to read:
319.520. As used in ORS 319.510 to 319.880, unless the context clearly indicates a  different
meaning:
(1) “Cardlock card” means a fuel card:
(a) Capable of generating an electronic invoice or electronic statement that includes the  infor-
mation required by ORS 319.671 and the applicable fuel tax amount;
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 2
(b) Issued for a specific vehicle, a specific piece of equipment or a group of equipment;
(c) That includes the qualifying information,  as designated by the Department of Transportation
by rule, that is printed on the electronic invoice or electronic statement;
(d) That allows the tax  status of the cardlock card to be indicated on the electronic invoice or
electronic statement and includes state tax as a separate item on the invoice or statement; and
(e) That  allows a cardlock card issuer to generate a statement recording, by fuel type, gallons
of fuel purchased for domestic and foreign customers each month.
(2) “Combined weight” means the total empty  weight of all vehicles in a combination plus the
total weight of the load carried on that combination of vehicles.
(3) “Delinquent” means having failed to pay a tax or penalty within the time provided by law.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.
(5) “Domestic customer” means a customer making a purchase  at a nonretail facility owned by
the cardlock card issuer.
(6) “Foreign customer” means a customer making a purchase at a nonretail facility owned by
a seller other than the cardlock card issuer.
(7) “Fuel” means any combustible gas, liquid or material of a kind used for the  generation of
power to propel a motor vehicle on the highways except motor vehicle fuel as defined in  ORS
319.010.
(8) “Highway” means  every way, thoroughfare and place, of whatever nature, open to the use
of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel.
(9) “Light weight”  means the weight of a vehicle when fully equipped for moving over the
highway.
(10) “Liquefied petroleum gas” includes propane, pentane  and any mixture of propane and
pentane.
[(10)] (11) “Motor vehicle” means every self-propelled vehicle operated on  the highway, except
an implement of husbandry used in agricultural operations and only incidentally  operated or moved
upon the highway.
[(11)] (12) “Nonretail facility” means:
(a) An unattended facility accessible only by cardlock  card and not associated with a retail fa-
cility; or
(b) An unattended portion of a retail facility separate from the retail  operations and accessible
only by cardlock card.
[(12)] (13) “Person” means  any individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association, corpo-
ration, trust, receiver or any group or combination acting as a unit.
[(13)] (14) “Seller” means:
(a) A person that sells fuel to a user; or
(b) If the fuel is dispensed at a nonretail facility, the person that owns  the user’s accounts and
bills the user for fuel purchased at a nonretail facility.
[(14)] (15) “To sell fuel for use in a motor vehicle” means to dispense or place  fuel for a price
into a receptacle on a motor vehicle, from  which receptacle the fuel is supplied to propel the motor
vehicle.
[(15)] (16) “To use fuel in a  motor vehicle” means to receive into any receptacle on a motor
vehicle, fuel to be consumed in propelling the motor vehicle  on the highways of this state; and, if
the fuel is received into the receptacle outside the taxing  jurisdiction of the state, “to use fuel in
a motor vehicle” means to consume in propelling the motor vehicle on the highways of this state.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 319.530 is amended to read:
319.530. (1) To compensate this state partially for the use of its highways, an excise tax  hereby
is imposed at the rate of 34 cents per gallon on the use of fuel in a motor vehicle.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) [ and (4)] to (6)  of this section, 100 cubic feet
of fuel used or sold in  a gaseous state, measured at 14.73 pounds per square inch of pressure at 60
degrees Fahrenheit, is taxable at the same rate as a gallon of liquid fuel.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 3
(3) [ One hundred twenty ] 123.57 cubic feet , or 5.66 pounds,  of compressed natural gas used  or
sold in a gaseous state[ , measured at 14.73 pounds per square inch of  pressure at 60 degrees
Fahrenheit,] is taxable at the same rate as [ a gallon of liquid fuel ] one gasoline gallon.
[(4) One and  three-tenths liquid gallons of propane at 60 degrees Fahrenheit is taxable at the same
rate as a gallon of other liquid fuel. ]
(4) 1.353 gallons, or 5.75 pounds, of  liquefied petroleum gas is taxable at the same rate
as one gasoline gallon.
(5) 1.71 gallons, or 6.059 pounds, of liquefied natural gas is taxable at the same rate  as
one diesel gallon.
(6) One kilogram of hydrogen is taxable at the same rate as one gasoline gallon.
SMALL CITY ALLOCATION
SECTION 6.  ORS 366.805 is amended to read:
366.805. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the appropriation specified in
ORS 366.800 shall be allocated to the cities as  provided in this subsection. The moneys subject to
allocation under this subsection shall be  distributed by the Department of Transportation according
to the following:
(a) The moneys shall be distributed to all the cities.
(b) Each city shall receive such share of the moneys as its population bears to the total  popu-
lation of the cities.
(2) Each  year, the sum of $2,500,000 shall be withdrawn from the appropriation specified in ORS
366.800 and $2,500,000 shall be withdrawn  from moneys available to the Department of Transporta-
tion from the State Highway  Fund. The sums withdrawn shall be transferred to a separate account
to be administered by the Department of Transportation.  The following apply to the account de-
scribed in this subsection:
(a) Money from the account shall be used only [ upon streets ] on roads :
(A) That are not a part  of the state highway system , with the exception of project elements
that are required to comply with federal or state law ;
(B) That are within cities with populations of 5,000 or fewer persons; and
(C) That  are inadequate for the capacity the [ streets serve ] roads serve  or are in a condition
detrimental to safety.
(b) To the extent moneys are available to fund whole projects,  all moneys in the  account
shall be [ allotted] allocated each year.
(c) Subject  to paragraph (d) of this subsection, the department shall determine [ the distribution
of the expenditures after considering applications from the cities submitted to  the department ] annual
allocation after considering applications, including project budgets, submitted by the cities
to the department .
(d) The department may enter into agreements  with cities upon the advice and counsel of the
small city  advisory committee to determine allocation based on those applications  [ organiza-
tions representing cities to establish: ]
[(A) The method of allotting moneys from the account; or ]
[(B) The method of  considering applications from cities and determining distribution based on the
applications].
(3) The Director of Transportation shall establish a small city advisory committee. The small
city advisory committee shall review  department  recommendations and approve  applications
submitted by small cities [ and shall recommend applications for approval ] to  the director. In consul-
tation with the League  of Oregon Cities, the director shall appoint to the  small city  advisory
committee one representative of a small city in each of the five regions of this state.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Region one consists of Clackamas, Hood River, Multnomah and Washington Counties.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 4
(b) Region two consists of Benton, Clatsop, Columbia, Lane, Lincoln,  Linn, Marion, Polk,
Tillamook and Yamhill Counties.
(c) Region three consists of Coos, Curry, Douglas, Jackson and Josephine Counties.
(d) Region four consists  of Crook, Deschutes, Gilliam, Jefferson, Klamath, Lake, Sherman, Wasco
and Wheeler Counties.
(e) Region five consists of  Baker, Grant, Harney, Malheur, Morrow, Umatilla, Union and
Wallowa Counties.
DRIVING PRIVILEGES
SECTION 7.
Section 8 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 8. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall adopt rules necessary to ad-
minister the federal Drug and Alcohol Clearinghouse.
(2) The department may not issue  or renew commercial driving privileges and may cancel
or suspend commercial driving privileges if a person has not complied with the  rules estab-
lished under this section.
(3) A person is entitled to an administrative  review under ORS 809.440 when the depart-
ment does not issue or renew commercial driving privileges under this section or  cancels or
suspends commercial driving privileges under this section.
SECTION 9.  ORS 807.080 is amended to read:
807.080. [(1) The Department of  Transportation, by rule, shall provide for the following in a man-
ner consistent with this section: ]
[(a) The issuance of driver competency testing certificates. ]
[(b) The regulation of persons issued driver competency testing certificates. ]
[(2) A person issued a driver competency testing certificate  under this section may certify, in a
manner established by the department, the competency of drivers to safely exercise driving  privileges
granted only under one or more of the following: ]
[(a) A Class A commercial driver license. ]
[(b) A Class B commercial driver license. ]
[(c) A Class C commercial driver license. ]
[(d) An endorsement related to a commercial driver license. ]
[(3) The department  may waive an actual demonstration of ability to operate a motor vehicle under
ORS 807.070 for an applicant who is certified by the holder of a driver competency testing certificate
as competent to exercise the driving privileges in the class of license  or in the endorsement sought by
the applicant.]
[(4) The rules adopted by the department under this section may establish reasonable fees for the
issuance of a certificate or as part of any program  of regulating certificate holders that is established
by the department. ]
[(5) When adopting rules under this section, the department may: ]
[(a) Make the  certificate renewable upon any basis determined convenient by the department and
may include  provisions for cancellation, revocation or suspension of certificates or for probation of
certificate holders.]
[(b) Provide for the issuance of certifications allowing the holder  to certify competency in several
classes or  types of driving privileges or limiting the classes or types of driving privileges for which the
holder may certify competency. ]
[(c) Establish the forms of certificates to be issued. ]
[(d) Establish  and require forms that are to be used by certificate holders in certifying
competency.]
[(e) Establish any qualifications or requirements for obtaining a  certificate that the department
determines necessary to protect the interests of persons seeking certification by certificate holders. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 5
[(f) Issue certificates to publicly owned and operated educational facilities to allow programs for
certification of competency. ]
[(g) Issue  certificates to employers to allow the employers to establish programs primarily for the
certification of employees’ competency. The department may  provide that programs established under
this paragraph may be operated without driver training school certificates under  ORS 822.500 and
without driver training instructor certificates under ORS 822.525. ]
[(h) Establish any other  provisions or requirements necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section.]
(1) The  Department of Transportation may adopt rules and enter into contracts neces-
sary for the regulation and certification of persons and organizations authorized  to certify
an individual’s competency to safely operate a motor  vehicle, including a commercial motor
vehicle, on behalf of the department.
(2) Rules adopted under this section may include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Establishing methods and procedures for the testing  of competency to operate dif-
ferent types of motor vehicles.
(b) Establishing the manner and mechanism by which test results shall  be sent to the
department.
(c) Establishing reasonable fees as part of any program for regulation created  by the
department under this section.
(d) Establishing grounds for suspension, cancellation or revocation of  a person’s or
organization’s authorization to certify competency to operate motor vehicles.
(e) Establishing requirements for records retention.
(f) Establishing requirements for inspections of premises, investigations and monitoring,
including covert monitoring, to ensure that testing is conducted in strict  accord with rules
adopted under this section.
(g) Establishing bond and insurance requirements.
(3) In adopting rules under this section, the department shall take into consideration the
regulations and laws of the federal government.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 807.220 is amended to read:
807.220. (1) The Department of Transportation shall provide for the issuance of emergency driver
permits in a manner consistent with this section.
(2) Except as  otherwise provided in this section an emergency driver permit is subject to the
fees, provisions, conditions, prohibitions and penalties applicable to a Class C  driver license.
(3) The following apply to an emergency driver permit:
(a) The department may issue an emergency driver permit to a person 14 years of  age or older.
(b) The department shall  place restrictions on the permit that designate the routes over which
the permit is valid. The department shall designate  routes it determines necessary from the facts
creating the emergency.
(c) The permit shall only be issued if the  department is satisfied that an emergency exists that
requires operation of a motor vehicle by the applicant.
(d) The department may establish a form for the permit that differs from the  form required for
a license.
(e) The  only fee required for issuance of the permit is the emergency driver permit fee under
ORS 807.370.
(f) The department may establish a period  for the expiration of the permit that coincides with
the end of the emergency that is the basis for the permit.
(g) The department shall cancel the permit if  the department determines that the holder of the
permit has operated a motor vehicle over any highway or for any purpose other than  one approved
under the permit.
(h) If an emergency driver permit is canceled, the person issued the permit is ineligible  to be
issued another emergency driver permit for a period of one year.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 6
(i) In addition to any other application requirements for the emergency driver permit,  the ap-
plicant must obtain the [ endorsement on the application ] approval of the sheriff of the county in
which the applicant resides.
(4) The department may issue an emergency driver permit, if the person qualifies for the permit,
to a person whose driving  privileges are suspended under ORS 809.280 because the department has
received an order suspending driving privileges under ORS 809.260. In addition  to other emergen-
cies, a situation that leaves the applicant with no alternative means to  travel to and from school is
an emergency for purposes of a permit issued under this subsection.
SECTION 11.  ORS 807.230 is amended to read:
807.230. The Department of Transportation shall  provide for issuance of special student driver
permits in a manner consistent with this section. A  special student driver permit grants the driving
privileges provided in this section or under  the permit. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
a special student driver permit is subject to the fees, provisions, conditions, prohibitions and penal-
ties applicable to a Class C  driver license. The following apply to a special student driver permit:
(1) The department may issue a  special student driver permit to a person 14 years of age or
older.
(2) The department shall  place restrictions on the permit to limit operation of a vehicle under
the permit to operation necessary as  a means of transportation to or from the school, college or
other educational institution attended by the person to whom the driver permit is issued.
(3) The permit shall only  be issued if the applicant has no other available means of transporta-
tion by which to continue the applicant’s education.
(4) The permit shall only be  issued if the department is satisfied that the applicant has had
sufficient experience in the operation  of motor vehicles to operate a motor vehicle without endan-
gering the safety of the public.
(5) The department  may establish a form for the permit that differs from the form required for
a license that is issued.
(6) The only fee required for issuance of the permit is the special student driver permit fee under
ORS 807.370.
(7) The department shall cancel the permit if the department  determines that the holder of the
permit has operated a motor vehicle over any highway or for any purpose other than  as approved
under the permit.
(8) If a special student driver permit is canceled, the person issued the permit is ineligible  to
be issued any license or driver permit until the person is old enough to be eligible for a license.
(9) In addition to any other application requirements for the special student driver permit, the
applicant must:
(a) Certify that the  applicant has no other available means of transportation that would enable
the applicant to continue the applicant’s education;
(b) Specify the road or highway over which the applicant desires to operate motor vehicles;
(c) Obtain the [ endorsement] approval of the sheriff of the county in which the applicant  resides
and of the principal of the school the applicant attends; and
(d) Provide any other information required by the department.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 807.310 is amended to read:
807.310. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall provide for the issuance of applicant tem-
porary driver permits in a manner consistent with this section.
(2) The department may issue an applicant temporary driver permit to an applicant for a Class
C driver  license or for a  noncommercial driver permit while the department is determining all facts
relative to application  for the  Class C  driver license or noncommercial driver permit. The de-
partment shall set  forth on the applicant temporary driver permit the driving privileges granted
under the permit.
(3) The holder of an applicant temporary driver permit must have the temporary driver  permit
on the holder’s person while operating a motor vehicle. The holder of an applicant temporary  driver
permit must operate within the driving privileges granted under the temporary driver permit.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 7
(4) An  applicant temporary driver permit is valid for a period of 30 days from the date issued.
The department  may extend the term of the permit for sufficient cause. An extension of the term
of the permit may not exceed an additional 30 days.
(5) An applicant temporary driver  permit automatically becomes invalid if the applicant’s license
or permit is issued or refused for good cause.
(6) The department may not charge a fee for issuance of an applicant temporary driver permit
under this section.
(7) The department  may, by rule, establish when an applicant may be issued a temporary
driver permit for commercial driving privileges.
SECTION 13. ORS 809.520, as amended by sections 107 and 108, chapter 630, Oregon Laws 2021,
is amended to read:
809.520. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 809.510  (1) to (5) and (7) , the Department  of Transportation
shall permanently suspend a person’s  commercial driving privileges for the lifetime of the person if
the department receives a record of conviction for a crime punishable as  a felony in which a motor
vehicle was used and that  involved the manufacturing, distributing or dispensing of a controlled
substance, as defined in ORS 475.005. The department may not  reinstate commercial driving privi-
leges of a person whose commercial driving privileges are suspended under this subsection.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 809.510 (1) to (5) and (7) , the department  shall permanently suspend
a person’s commercial driving privileges for the lifetime of  the person if the department receives a
record of conviction for a crime in which a commercial motor  vehicle was used and that involved
an act or practice of severe forms of trafficking in persons as defined by the department by  rule.
The department may not reinstate commercial driving privileges of  a person whose commercial
driving privileges are suspended under this subsection.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 809.510 (1) to (5) and (7) , the department shall  suspend a person’s
commercial  driving  privileges for the lifetime of the person if the department receives a second or
subsequent record, report or notice  described in ORS 809.510  (1) to (5) and (7)  that does not arise
out of the same incident and that would be grounds for suspension of the person’s  commercial
driving privileges under ORS 809.510 (1) to (5) and (7) .
(b) The department may adopt  rules providing for the reinstatement of commercial driving
privileges suspended under this subsection. The  department may not reinstate commercial driving
privilege suspensions under this subsection earlier than 10 years after the date  that the person’s
commercial driving privileges are suspended under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The department shall permanently suspend a person’s commercial driving privileges for  the
lifetime of the person if the department receives a record, report or notice described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection that relates  to conduct that occurred after the person’s commercial driving
privileges were reinstated under  paragraph (b) of this subsection. The department may not reinstate
the commercial driving privileges of a person whose commercial driving privileges  are suspended
under this paragraph.
(4) A suspension imposed under this section is consecutive to any other  suspension imposed
under ORS 809.510, 809.525, 809.530 or 809.535, if  the suspensions do not arise out of the same in-
cident.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 820.110 is amended to read:
820.110. (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt  and enforce rules to establish require-
ments of operation, qualifications or special training of drivers and  special accident reports for
school buses and school activity vehicles.
(2) The governing board of  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 may adopt and enforce
separate standards  of the type described under this section for school buses and school activity ve-
hicles that are under its jurisdiction.
(3) The rules and standards adopted under this section:
(a) Are subject  to ORS 820.190 and 820.200 and to any other statute or regulation relating to
the operation of vehicles, qualifications of drivers and accident reports.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 8
(b) Must be consistent with requirements established by statute or by rule adopted under stat-
utory authority that relate to the same subject.
(c) May include different requirements for different classes or types of school buses  or school
activity  vehicles.
(d) May include any exemptions determined appropriate under ORS 820.150.
(4) If the Department of Transportation  suspends, cancels or revokes any driving privileges of
a person who holds a school bus endorsement [ under ORS 807.035 (5) ], the Department of Trans-
portation shall notify the Department of Education of the suspension, cancellation or revocation.
WEIGHMASTER AUTHORITY
SECTION 15.
 ORS 153.083, as amended by section 4, chapter 64, Oregon Laws  2022, is amended
to read:
153.083. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 and 9.320, in any trial of a  violation, whether created
by ordinance or statute, in which a city attorney or  district attorney does not appear, the peace
officer who issued  the citation for the offense may present evidence, examine and cross-examine
witnesses and make arguments relating to:
(a) The application of statutes and rules to the facts in the case;
(b) The literal meaning of the statutes or rules at issue in the case;
(c) The admissibility of evidence; and
(d) Proper procedures to be used in the trial.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 and 9.320, in any trial of a violation, whether created by ordi-
nance or statute, in which a city attorney or district attorney does not appear, the duly authorized
traffic enforcement agent  who issued the citation for the offense may present the evidence reviewed
by the agent as the basis for issuing a citation under ORS 810.436, 810.437 or 810.444.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 and  9.320, in any trial of a violation, whether created by
ordinance or statute, in which a city attorney or district attorney does  not appear, the
weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer who issued  the citation for the offense
may present the evidence reviewed by the weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer
as the basis for issuing a citation listed under ORS 810.530.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  As used in this section, “duly authorized traffic enforcement agent”  means an in-
dividual who:
(A) Is employed, appointed and duly sworn in by the governing body  of the incorporated city in
which the agent performs the agent’s duties; and
(B) Has completed all necessary technical, administrative  and other training to review photo-
graphs and issue citations under ORS 810.436, 810.437 or 810.444.
(b) Duly authorized traffic enforcement agents  are not police officers as defined in ORS 801.395.
VEHICLE DEALERS
SECTION 16.
 ORS 822.035 is amended to read:
822.035. The Department of Transportation:
(1) Upon receipt of an application for a vehicle dealer certificate, shall  examine the application
and may make an individual investigation relative to statements contained in the application.
(2) Upon being satisfied that an applicant is entitled  to a vehicle dealer certificate and that the
proper fees have been paid for the  certificate, shall assign the vehicle dealer a distinctive dealer
number that allows the dealer to conduct business  under the certificate and shall forward to the
dealer a vehicle dealer certificate stating thereon the dealer’s number.
(3) Has authority to determine whether  or not an applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate is a
vehicle dealer.
(4) Has authority to make suitable rules for the issuance  of vehicle dealer certificates to expire
consistently with ORS [ 822.040] 822.020.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 9
(5) May make inspections of any vehicle dealer records required under ORS 822.045 and  of any
vehicles included in a vehicle dealer’s inventory or located on the vehicle dealer’s premises.  In-
spections authorized by this subsection may be conducted by the department at reasonable
intervals[ , during normal business hours, ] and may not exceed a scope of inspection necessary for
the department to determine the following:
(a) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with statutes regulating vehicle dealers under  the vehicle
code;
(b) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with those provisions of the vehicle code regulating  the titling
and registration of vehicles;
(c) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with rules adopted by the department relating  to the regu-
lation of vehicle dealers and the registration and titling of vehicles; and
(d) The identification of stolen vehicles.
(6) May make inspections during the normal business hours of the department,  from
Monday through Friday.
[(6)] (7)  Shall provide a vehicle dealer with plates or devices authorized under ORS  805.200 to
allow the exercise of the privileges granted under ORS 822.040.
[(7)] (8)  May provide a vehicle dealer with identification cards in the names of the owners  of
the business or in the names of authorized employees of the business.
[(8)] (9)  May not issue a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 to an applicant who has
been issued a similar certificate from another jurisdiction that has  been revoked or is currently
suspended unless  the applicant possesses a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS
822.020.
[(9)] (10) May not use the revocation  or suspension by another [ state] jurisdiction of a vehicle
dealer certificate  or similar certificate as a basis for refusing to allow a vehicle dealer holding a
current, valid vehicle  dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.020 to obtain a vehicle dealer certif-
icate under ORS 822.020 or a  supplemental certificate under ORS 822.040 [ or to renew a certificate
under ORS 822.040 ].
[(10)] (11) May adopt any reasonable rules necessary  for the administration of the laws relating
to the regulation of vehicle dealers, the issuance of vehicle  dealer certificates, the issuance of ve-
hicle dealer identification cards,  regulation of vehicle dealers designated as agents under ORS
802.031 and  the issuance of vehicle dealer plates. The rules adopted under this subsection must be
consistent with the statutory provisions of the vehicle code. The rules may  include, but are not
limited to, grounds and procedures for the  revocation, denial, probation or suspension of vehicle
dealer certificates or of a vehicle dealer’s designation to act as an agent of the department.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 822.020 is amended to read:
822.020. (1) Except as provided in ORS 822.022 and 822.035  [ (8)] (9) , the Department of Trans-
portation shall issue a vehicle  dealer certificate to any person if the person meets all of the fol-
lowing requirements:
[(1)] (a)  The  person must complete the application for a dealer certificate described under ORS
822.025.
[(2)] (b)  The person must deliver to the  department a bond or letter of credit that meets the
requirements under ORS 822.030.
[(3)] (c)  The person must deliver to the department a certificate of insurance that meets the
requirements established by ORS 822.033.
[(4)] (d) The person must pay the fee required under ORS 822.700 for issuance of a vehicle dealer
certificate.
[(5)] (e)  The person must  certify completion of the precertification education and test require-
ments of ORS 822.027 (1)(a) if the  person is a dealer subject to the education and test requirements.
(2) A vehicle dealer certificate issued or renewed under this section expires three years
after the date of issuance or renewal.
(3) A vehicle dealer certificate may be renewed  if the applicant for renewal does all of the
following:
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 10
(a) Pays the required fee for renewal under ORS 822.700.
(b) Delivers to the department a bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.030.
(c) Delivers to the department a certificate  of insurance that meets the requirements
under ORS 822.033.
(d) Provides the names of all partners or corporate officers.
(e) Certifies completion  of the continuing education requirements of ORS 822.027 (1)(b)
if the person is a dealer subject to the education requirements.
(f) If the dealer offers new recreational vehicles for sale  under the certificate, certifies
that the dealer maintains a recreational vehicle service facility as listed  in the dealer cer-
tificate application described in ORS 822.025.
(4) If a civil penalty assessed under ORS 822.009 remains unpaid after the date of issuance
of the  final order, the department may refuse to issue or renew a vehicle dealer certificate
under this section,  until the civil penalty is paid in full or until six years have passed since
the date of issuance of the final order, whichever occurs first.
(5) The department may adopt  rules for the issuance and renewal of vehicle dealer cer-
tificates under this section.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 822.040 is amended to read:
822.040. (1) The holder of a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS  822.020
may exercise the following privileges under the certificate:
(a) Subject to ORS 822.045,  a dealer is authorized, without violating ORS  803.025 or 803.300,
to use and operate over and along  the highways of this state [ all] vehicles displaying the dealer’s
plates whether registered or not or whether or not  a title is issued for the vehicle[ .] if the vehicle:
(A) Is owned or controlled by the dealer;
(B) Is used by the dealer, members of the dealer’s firm, any salesperson thereof or any
person authorized by the dealer;
(C) Indicates it is offered for sale; and
(D) When offered for sale, is available for display  during the vehicle dealer’s normal
business hours. [This paragraph does not  authorize dealers to use or operate vehicles under dealer
plates unless the vehicles are actually owned or controlled by the dealer and in actual use by  the
dealer, members of  the dealer’s firm, any salesperson thereof or any person authorized by the dealer.
Vehicles operated under dealer plates may  be used for the same purposes as are any other vehicles
registered in this  state that are registered by payment of the fee under ORS 803.420. This paragraph
is subject to the limitations under ORS 822.045. ]
(b) A dealer is entitled to receive dealer plates or devices and  replacement or additional dealer
plates or devices. As  many additional dealer plates as may be desired may be obtained upon the
filing of a formal application for  additional plates with the Department of Transportation. The plates
issued to dealers shall require the payment of fees as provided under ORS 805.250.
(c) The person  is not subject to the prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.005 as long as the
holder’s vehicle dealer business is conducted in a location approved under the certificate.
(d) The dealer  shall be considered the owner of vehicles manufactured or dealt in by the dealer,
before delivery and sale of the vehicles, and of all  vehicles in the dealer’s possession and operated
or driven by the dealer or the dealer’s employees.
(e) Notwithstanding ORS 825.474, in lieu of paying  the weight-mile tax imposed under ORS
825.474, the dealer may pay the  fuel taxes imposed under ORS 319.020 and 319.530, when the vehicle:
(A) Displays the dealer’s plates;
(B) Is actually owned or controlled by  the dealer and in actual use by the dealer, members of
the dealer’s firm, any salesperson of the dealer or any person authorized by the dealer;
(C) Is operated on the highway for the purpose of test driving the vehicle; and
(D) Is unloaded.
(2) The holder of a vehicle dealer certificate may open additional places of business under  the
same business name by obtaining a supplemental  certificate from the department under this sub-
section. The following all apply to a supplemental certificate issued under this subsection:
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 11
(a) The department may not issue  a supplemental certificate under this subsection if the addi-
tional place of business opened will be operated under a different business name than that indicated
on the current certificate. Any business that a  vehicle dealer operates under a separate business
name must be operated under a separate certificate and the dealer must apply for and pay the  fees
for a regular dealer certificate for the business.
(b) A supplemental certificate issued under this subsection is subject to the fee  for supplemental
certificate under ORS 822.700.
(3) The holder of a vehicle dealer certificate may move a place of business or change a business
name by obtaining a corrected certificate  from the department. For purposes of this subsection,
“place of business”  includes a recreational vehicle service facility as defined in ORS 822.082. The
following apply to a corrected certificate issued under this subsection:
(a) The department shall prescribe the form for application for a corrected certificate.
(b) A person  applying for a corrected certificate shall pay the fee for the corrected certificate
established in ORS 822.700.
(4) The department may establish by rule the requirements  a holder of a vehicle dealer certif-
icate must meet to display a vehicle at a location other than  the dealer’s place of business for the
purpose of advertising without first  obtaining a supplemental certificate from the department. In
addition to any requirements established by the department by rule, all of the following apply:
(a) The dealer must have a signed agreement  with the owner of the property or the person using
the property where the vehicle  is to be displayed stating that the vehicle is for an advertising pro-
motion only and that the  processing of any documents or other activities required to purchase a
vehicle must be done at the dealer’s place of business.
(b) The vehicle on display must be  clearly marked with the dealer’s name and contact informa-
tion and a notice that the vehicle is  displayed only for the purpose of advertising and may be pur-
chased only at the dealer’s place of business.
(c) Displaying the vehicle must not violate any zoning laws or ordinances.
(d) The dealer or the dealer’s employees may not remain with the  vehicle except for the purpose
of moving the vehicle in or out of the display area.
[(5) A vehicle dealer certificate is valid for a three-year period and may  be renewed as provided
by the department. The department shall  only renew a certificate if the applicant for renewal does all
of the following: ]
[(a) Pays the required fee for renewal under ORS 822.700. ]
[(b) Delivers to the department a bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.030. ]
[(c) Delivers to the department a certificate of insurance that meets the requirements under ORS
822.033.]
[(d) Provides the names of all partners or corporate officers. ]
[(e) Certifies completion of the continuing education requirements of ORS  822.027 (1)(b) if the per-
son is a dealer subject to the education requirements. ]
[(f) If the dealer  offers new recreational vehicles for sale under the certificate, certifies that the
dealer maintains a recreational vehicle service facility as listed in the dealer certificate application de-
scribed in ORS 822.025. ]
[(6) The department may adopt suitable  rules for the issuance and renewal of certificates under this
section and ORS 822.020. ]
SECTION 19.
 ORS 822.050 is amended to read:
822.050. (1) The Department of Transportation may revoke, suspend or place on probation a ve-
hicle dealer if the department determines  at any time for due cause that the dealer has done any
of the following:
(a) Violated any grounds  for revocation, suspension or probation adopted by the department by
rule under ORS 822.035.
(b) Failed to comply with the requirements  of the vehicle code with reference to notices or re-
ports of the transfer of vehicles or campers.
(c) Caused or suffered or  is permitting the unlawful use of any certificate or registration plates.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 12
(d) Violated or caused or permitted to be violated ORS 815.410, 815.415, 815.425 or 815.430.
(e) Falsely certified under ORS  822.033 that the dealer is exempt from the requirement under
ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040] to file a certificate of insurance.
(f) Continued to fail to provide clear title or repeatedly failed to provide clear title  in violation
of ORS 822.045.
(g) Knowingly certified false information required by  the department on an application for a
vehicle dealer certificate, supplemental certificate or corrected certificate.
(h) Failed to pay a civil penalty assessed under ORS 822.009 and the amount of  penalty
was not paid within 10 days after the order becomes final.
(i) Displayed dealer plates on vehicles unless the vehicle was offered for sale.
(2) The department shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate 45 days  after receipt of legal notice
that the bond described under ORS 822.030 is canceled, unless the department  receives proof from
the vehicle dealer that the dealer has obtained another bond. Between the day that  the department
receives notice that the bond is canceled and the day the vehicle dealer presents proof of another
bond, the vehicle dealer may not act as a vehicle dealer.
(3) The department shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate 45  days after receipt of notice that
the certificate of insurance required under ORS 822.033 is canceled, unless  the department receives
proof from the  vehicle dealer that the dealer has obtained another certificate of insurance. Between
the day that the department receives notice that the  certificate of insurance is canceled and the day
the vehicle dealer presents proof of another certificate of insurance, the  vehicle dealer may not act
as a vehicle dealer.
(4) The department shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate immediately upon receipt of  notice
that zoning approval for the business has been revoked.
(5) Upon revocation, cancellation  or suspension of a vehicle dealer certificate under this section,
the department shall recall and demand the return of the certificate and any vehicle  dealer plates
issued.
VEHICLE REGISTRATION PLATES
SECTION 20.
 ORS 805.210 is amended to read:
805.210. (1) The owner of a vehicle of special interest may apply to the Department of  Trans-
portation  for  permission to use special interest registration plates. To receive permission to use
special interest registration plates the person must:
(a) Maintain the vehicle of special interest as a collectors’  item and use the vehicle only for
exhibitions, parades, club activities and similar uses but not use  the vehicle primarily for the
transportation of persons or property;
(b) Supply the special interest registration plates which the person desires to use; and
(c) Include the plates with the application for permission to use them.
(2) The department  shall determine which special interest plates are available for issu-
ance under this section.
[(2)] (3) The department, prior to approval of an application under this  section, shall determine
that the special interest registration plates meet the following requirements:
(a) The plates shall be issued by the State of Oregon for use on vehicles in this state.
(b) The numbers and characters on the plate shall be distinctive.
(c) The plates shall  be legible, durable and otherwise of a size, shape, color and design that will
serve the purposes of safety and identification.
(d) If the plates are from a series  of plates in current use, the plates shall be from the same year
or period of issue in which the vehicle was manufactured.
[(3)] (4) If the special interest registration plate offered for approval was issued  in a year in
which single registration plates only were required, the  department shall grant permission for use
of that registration plate alone if it is otherwise acceptable.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 13
[(4)] (5) If the special interest registration plates offered for approval are from a series of plates
in current use, as described in subsection [ (2)(d)] (3)(d) of this section, the department  may affix a
distinctive sticker to each plate at the time of approval. Stickers shall be of a size, color and design
determined by the department and shall be displayed on plates in the manner determined by  the
department.
[(5)] (6) The department may approve plates issued by the state that have been restored to  their
original color and design provided that  if the plate was reflectorized when originally issued, it must
be fully reflectorized when restored.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 803.530 is amended to read:
803.530. (1) Registration plates assigned to a vehicle by the Department of Transportation shall
remain with the vehicle to which the plates are assigned and are valid only during  the registration
period for which the plates are issued except as provided in this section.
(2) The department may allow registration plates to be transferred to another vehicle if:
(a) The department receives an application;
(b) The applicant pays the plate transfer fee under ORS 803.575; and
(c) The applicant complies with the registration qualifications described in ORS 803.350.
(3) The department shall  transfer registration plates under this section if the applicant and the
vehicle qualify for the plates and the plates are:
(a) Legible and capable of being used for identification purposes; and
(b) Any of the following:
(A) From a current issue of registration plates;
(B) Customized registration plates described under ORS 805.240;
(C) Oregon Trail  commemorative registration plates issued under section 113, chapter 741,
Oregon Laws 1993;
(D) Special registration plates  issued under ORS 805.255, 805.260, 805.263, 805.266, 805.278 or
805.283;
(E) Group registration plates issued under ORS 805.205;
(F) Veterans’ recognition registration plates issued under ORS 805.105;
(G) Pacific Wonderland registration plates issued under ORS 805.287; or
(H) Registration plates issued through the special registration program under ORS 805.222.
(I) Registration plates that  are no longer currently issued that the department deter-
mines may still be transferred.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 803.400, when registration plates are  transferred from one vehicle to
another vehicle owned by the same person, the registration period represented  by the plates also
transfers with the plates. When registration plates are transferred from one vehicle to another ve-
hicle not owned by the same person, the remaining registration period  represented by the trans-
ferred plates ceases for both the vehicle receiving the transferred plates and the vehicle  from which
the plates were removed.
(5) The owner  of a registered vehicle to which a plate is assigned may replace a registration
plate. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) To replace a plate  under this subsection, the owner must apply to the department for re-
placement of  the plate in a form prescribed by the department and pay the replacement plate fee
established under ORS 803.575.
(b) The department, in lieu of replacement,  may issue duplicate plates for the same fee as
charged for replacements.
(c) The plates issued under this subsection are valid only for the period of the plates replaced.
(d) The replaced plates may not be considered customized plates when they are replaced, if:
(A) The original plates were from plates currently issued;
(B) The original plates were not customized plates; and
(C) The replacement plates are a duplicate of the original plates.
(e) When a vehicle is assigned a pair of plates and the owner  wishes to replace a single plate,
the department may replace a single plate rather than replace both plates.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 14
(6) A county may replace a registration plate that is from a specially designed government se-
ries with a registration plate that is from a regular series. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) To replace a  plate under this subsection, the county must apply to the department for re-
placement of the plate in a form prescribed by the department and pay the replacement plate  fee
established under ORS 803.575.
(b) The plates issued under this subsection are valid only for the period of the plates replaced.
(7) If  the department retired the vehicle’s registration under ORS 819.030 because the vehicle
is totaled or  substantially altered, a person may apply under subsection (2) of this section to transfer
the registration plates to another vehicle.
(8) Subject to subsections (2) and (4) of this section,  after the department authorizes the use of
special interest plates under ORS 805.210, a person may apply to transfer the plates to either:
(a) A vehicle that was  previously determined by the department to qualify as a vehicle of special
interest; or
(b) A vehicle approved by the department as  a vehicle of special interest at the time of appli-
cation.
(9) If a person described in subsection (8) of this section  provides the department with only one
special interest registration plate for transfer and the department’s vehicle records show  the special
interest registration plate belongs to a vehicle record with no owner  matching an applicant, the
applicant shall provide proof, as determined by the department by rule, that the plate  is no longer
used on the vehicle it is currently showing being registered to in the department’s vehicle records.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 805.103 is amended to read:
805.103. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall provide for issuance of registration plates
for a  motor vehicle registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(a), in a manner consistent with this section,
to motor vehicle owners who qualify for the plates as Congressional Medal of  Honor recipients un-
der subsection (2) this section.
(2) A person who is a Congressional  Medal of Honor recipient qualifies for registration plates
under this section if the person provides the department with  a certificate from the United States
Department of  Veterans Affairs attesting to the person’s status as a Congressional Medal of Honor
recipient.
(3) Registration plates issued under this section shall  be considered customized registration
plates for purposes of the  fee required in ORS 805.250. The department may waive the fee required
in ORS 805.250.
(4) The department  may not issue registration plates for a motor vehicle under this section if
another motor vehicle owned by the applicant has been issued  registration plates under this section.
(5) The registration plates issued under this section shall:
(a) Be issued with a unique background design determined by the department;
(b) Be issued with a specific configuration as determined by the department;
(c) Contain the words “Medal of Honor”;
(d) Contain the image of the Congressional Medal of Honor; and
(e) Meet the requirements for registration plates under ORS 803.535.
(6) If there is  a transfer of interest in the motor vehicle to which the registration plate under
this section is assigned, or if the motor vehicle  is totaled and not reconstructed, the motor vehicle
owner shall remove the registration plate. The Congressional Medal  of Honor recipient may retain
the registration plate, but the registration plate  may not be placed on any other motor vehicle un-
less the registration plate is transferred as set forth in subsection (7) of this section.
(7) If the motor vehicle owner qualifies for the registration plates  under subsection (2) of this
section, the department may transfer registration plates issued under this section  to another motor
vehicle registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(a), as set forth in ORS [ 805.242] 803.530.
(8) The  department shall cancel any registration plates issued under this section if the depart-
ment determines that the motor vehicle is owned by a person who does not  qualify for the regis-
tration plates under subsection (2) of this  section or that the motor vehicle is not registered under
ORS 803.420 (6)(a).
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 15
(9) The department may adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION NUMBERS
SECTION 23.  ORS 803.212 is amended to read:
803.212. (1) The Department of  Transportation, or persons or agencies authorized to do so by the
department, shall  conduct a physical inspection of the vehicle identification number or numbers of
each vehicle located in this state and required by ORS 803.210 to be inspected. The department  may
designate certified dealers  and law enforcement agencies, by rule,  to perform the inspection  and
may enter into agreements with the  Oregon State Police or other law enforcement agencies of this
state to perform inspections  for compensation . The inspection  shall determine whether the vehicle
identification  number  or numbers match those on the records of the department, on the title or
primary ownership record or contained in other information received by the department.
(2) If a vehicle that is required  by ORS 803.210 to be inspected is located in another jurisdiction,
the department may designate a person or agency in such jurisdiction to perform the physical in-
spection and may waive the inspection fee.
(3) Except as provided  in subsection (4) of this section, the department shall check the vehicle
identification number or numbers of all vehicles required  by ORS 803.210 to be inspected against
those listed as stolen at the National Crime Information Center. If the check indicates the vehicle
is stolen, the department:
(a) Shall immediately notify  the Oregon State Police or, if the department determines it would
be appropriate to do so, notify another law enforcement agency; and
(b) Shall not issue title  within 30 days of giving the notice required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection unless the  department is notified before the end of the 30 days that the vehicle is not
stolen. After the passage of the 30-day period, the department may issue the title.
(4) The department may refer a vehicle to the Oregon State Police or  other appropriate law
enforcement agency for a vehicle  identification number or product identification number inspection
if:
(a) Inspection of the vehicle under  this section reveals that the vehicle identification number
or product identification number on  the vehicle is different from the number provided to the de-
partment or appears to have been tampered with, altered or defaced; or
(b) The vehicle is a reconstructed or assembled vehicle or has been reported destroyed or to-
taled under ORS 819.012, 819.014 or 819.030 or  is any other salvaged vehicle from another jurisdic-
tion. This  subsection does not apply to a vehicle that has been reported totaled to the department
because of theft and has subsequently been recovered.
(5) If the department refers a vehicle to a law enforcement agency  under subsection (4) of this
section, the law enforcement agency shall inspect the vehicle. If the law enforcement agency deter-
mines that there  is reason to believe that the identification number of the vehicle has been tampered
with, altered or forged or that  the vehicle is stolen, the law enforcement agency may seize the ve-
hicle and may hold the vehicle  until completing an investigation to establish the origin and owner-
ship of the vehicle.  The department shall reimburse the Department of State Police, and may
reimburse any other law enforcement agency, for any inspections conducted  under this subsection
in an amount agreed upon by the department and the  Department of State Police or other law
enforcement agency.
ODOMETER DISCLOSURE
SECTION 24.
 ORS 803.102 is amended to read:
803.102. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Transferee” means any person to  whom ownership of a motor vehicle is transferred by
purchase, gift or  any other means other than by creation of a security interest and any person who,
as an agent, signs an odometer disclosure statement for the transferee.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 16
(b) “Transferor” means any person who transfers ownership of a motor vehicle by sale, gift or
any means other than by creation  of a security interest and any person who, as an agent, signs an
odometer disclosure statement for the transferor.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon transfer of any interest in a motor vehicle,
an odometer disclosure statement shall be made  by the transferor to the transferee. The disclosure
shall be in a  form that complies with the provisions of ORS 803.120 and shall contain the informa-
tion required under ORS 803.122.
(3) If a transfer requiring  a disclosure statement involves a leased vehicle, the lessor shall notify
the lessee that  the lessee is required to provide odometer disclosure. The lessee shall furnish the
lessor with a form that complies with the requirements  of ORS 803.120 and shall provide the infor-
mation required by ORS 803.122 except that for purposes  of the required information, the lessee
shall be considered the transferor, the lessor shall be considered the transferee and the  date shall
be the date of the disclosure statement.
(4) Where an interest in a vehicle  is transferred by operation of law, the Department of Trans-
portation shall determine  by rule whether an odometer disclosure statement is required and if so,
who is required to provide it.
(5) The department, by rule, may exempt vehicles from the odometer disclosure requirements  of
this section in accordance with federal laws, rules or regulations pertaining to odometer disclosure
requirements.
[(6) A person may provide an odometer reading to the department, in the manner prescribed by the
department by rule, for a vehicle that is 10 years old or older. ]
SECTION 24a.
 ORS 803.120 is amended to read:
803.120. (1) When an odometer  disclosure is required by statute or by the Department of
Transportation, [ or when an odometer reading  is provided under ORS 803.102 (6), ] the disclosure or
reading shall be provided in a form required  by the department by rule. The department may require
different forms for  different situations and may require different information to be disclosed for dif-
ferent purposes.
(2) Any form authorized by the department for use as an odometer  disclosure upon transfer of
an interest in a vehicle shall refer to the federal law requiring disclosure of odometer information
and shall state that failure to complete the disclosure form, or providing false information on the
form, may result in a fine or imprisonment.
(3) Any form authorized by  the department for use as an odometer disclosure upon transfer of
an interest in a  vehicle shall provide a way for the transferor to indicate, to the best of the
transferor’s knowledge, which of the following is true:
(a) That the odometer reading reflects the actual mileage of the vehicle;
(b) That the odometer reading reflects  an amount of mileage in excess of the designed mechan-
ical odometer limit; or
(c) That the odometer reading does not reflect actual mileage and should not be relied on.
(4) An odometer disclosure required  upon transfer of an interest in a vehicle shall be made on
the vehicle title unless the department provides otherwise by rule.
COMMERCIAL DRIVER TRAINING SCHOOLS
SECTION 25.
ORS 822.505, 822.510, 822.520, 822.525, 822.530 and 822.535 are repealed.
SECTION 26.  ORS 822.515 is amended to read:
822.515. (1) A person who holds a  valid, current commercial driver training school certificate
issued under this section is not subject to the prohibitions or penalties under ORS 822.500.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall adopt rules to provide for the issuance of commer-
cial driver training school certificates under this section and driver training instructor  certif-
icates. [ Rules adopted by the department under this section shall  provide requirements for all of the
following: ]
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 17
[(a) Requirements for a certificate under this  section including requirements concerning manner
and form of application, location, place of business, facilities, records, equipment, courses and stand-
ards of instruction, instructors, previous records of the school  and instructors, financial statements,
schedule of fees and charges, character  of school operators and instructors, vehicle equipment and
condition and inspection during reasonable business hours. ]
[(b) Any other matters the department may prescribe for the protection of the public. ]
[(3) The department: ]
[(a) May refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke any certificate issued under this section
in any case where the department finds that the applicant or certificate  holder has violated or failed
to comply with any rules adopted under this section or any provision of this section, ORS  822.500 to
822.510, 822.525 or 822.530.]
[(b) Shall cancel immediately any certificate if a  bond described under ORS 822.505 is canceled
by legal notice. ]
[(4) Commercial  driver training school certificates issued under this section are subject to the fol-
lowing:]
[(a) A certificate shall expire on the last day of each calendar year. ]
(3) The rules adopted under  this section related to commercial driver training schools
may prescribe, but need not be limited to:
(a) The form and manner of the application;
(b) The minimum qualifications for the commercial driver training school certificate;
(c) Grounds and procedures for the denial of a certificate;
(d) Requirements for the location of the place of business and location of facilities;
(e) Requirements for records retention;
(f) Vehicle equipment standards;
(g) Courses and standards of instruction;
(h) Fee schedules;
(i) Requirements for character of school operators and instructors; and
(j) Any other matters the  department considers necessary for the protection of the
public.
(4) The rules related to driver training  instructors may prescribe, but need not be limited
to:
(a) The form and manner of the application;
(b) The minimum qualifications for the driver training instructor certificate;
(c) Grounds and procedures for the denial of a certificate; and
(d) Any other matters the department considers necessary for the protection of the
public.
(5) The department  may suspend, revoke or cancel a certificate issued under this section
if the department finds that the person has failed to comply with a rule adopted by the  de-
partment pursuant to this section.
(6) A person subject  to discipline under this section is entitled to a contested case hear-
ing in accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(7) Commercial driver training school certificates issued under  this section expire two
years from the date of issuance.
(8) Driver training instructor certificates issued under  this section expire on the date the
certificate of the commercial driver training school that employs the instructor expires.
(9) Commercial driver training school certificates and driver  training instructor certif-
icates issued under this section are subject to the following:
[(b)] (a) The department [ shall] may not issue a certificate to a person  until the fee for issuance
of the certificate under ORS 822.700 is paid.
[(c)] (b)  The department [ shall] may  not renew a certificate  until the fee for renewal of the
certificate under ORS 822.700 has been paid.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 18
[(d)] (c)  A fee  for a certificate may not be refunded in the event any certificate is refused, sus-
pended, canceled or revoked.
[(e) The  department shall not issue or renew a certificate unless the applicant or certificate holder
maintains a bond that meets the requirements under ORS 822.505. ]
[(f) The department shall not issue or renew a certificate unless  the applicant or certificate holder
maintains proof of insurance that meets the requirements under ORS 822.510. ]
SECTION 27.  ORS 822.700 is amended to read:
822.700. (1) Fee for issuance or renewal of dismantler certificates covering a single  place of
business, or a supplemental certificate for each additional  place of business to be covered by that
certificate and operated under the same name, $500.
(2) Fee for each duplicate dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110, $40.
(3) Fee for original issuance  or renewal  of vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 [ or re-
newal under ORS 822.040 ] of a vehicle dealer certificate:
(a) $1,100, for a certificate covering a single place of business; and
(b) $350, for each additional  place of business to be covered by the certificate and operated
under the same name.
(4) Fee for each corrected vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.040, $30.
(5) If a vehicle dealer or dismantler fails to pay a fee required under this section  on or before
the date the fee is due, there shall be added as a late payment charge a fee of $150.
(6) Fee for show license issued under ORS 822.084, $50.
(7) Fee for issuance of towing business certificate under ORS 822.205  or renewal under ORS
822.210, $17 for each vehicle used for towing or recovery purposes.
(8) Fee for  issuance or renewal of vehicle transporter certificate under  ORS 822.310, [ $150]
$450.
(9) Fee for issuance or renewal of driver training instructor  certificate under ORS [ 822.530]
822.515, [ $100] $200.
(10) Fee for issuance or renewal of commercial driver training school certificate under  ORS
822.515, [$200] $400.
(11) Fee for issuance or renewal of vehicle appraiser certificate under ORS 819.480, $100.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 822.990 is amended to read:
822.990. (1) The Department of Transportation may levy and collect  a civil penalty in the
amount of $1,000 for each violation against any person who violates ORS 822.500 [ or 822.525].
(2) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 29.
(1) The amendments to ORS 822.515  and 822.700 by sections 26 and 27 of this
2023 Act and the repeal of ORS 822.505, 822.510, 822.520, 822.525, 822.530 and  822.535 by section
25 of this 2023 Act apply to driver training  instructor certificates and commercial driver
training school certificates issued or renewed on or after the operative  date specified in
section 52 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 822.700 by section 27 of this 2023 Act  apply to fees imposed
on or after the operative date specified in section 52 of this 2023 Act.
VEHICLE TRANSPORTERS
SECTION 30.  ORS 822.310 is amended to read:
822.310. (1) The holder of a current, valid vehicle transporter certificate issued under this sec-
tion may exercise the following privileges under this certificate:
(a) The person is not  subject to the prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.300 while trans-
porting vehicles as provided under this section.
(b) The  person is entitled to apply for and receive [ a sufficient number of ] no more than 10
special vehicle transporter plates or devices and may transport vehicles as provided  under this
section  in this state  while displaying the plate or device. Only one plate or device shall be dis-
played on a vehicle. The plates or devices shall require a  fee for issuance as provided in ORS
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 19
805.250. A plate or device issued under this paragraph may be used on any vehicle transported  by
the person.
(c) The person may drive or tow on its own wheels over the highways  of this state any unreg-
istered vehicle or manufactured structure  from outside this state or from manufacturers or dealers
within this state to  a prospective purchaser, manufacturer or dealer in this or any other state, ter-
ritory or foreign country. This paragraph only permits the person to  transport manufactured struc-
tures from the place of  manufacture to the place of business of a manufactured structure dealer
holding a license  under ORS 446.691 or 446.696 or a temporary manufactured structure dealer li-
cense under ORS 446.701 or to a place outside of Oregon. Any other movement of a manufactured
structure by the person must be under a trip permit issued by a county as agent  for the Department
of Consumer and Business Services.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall provide  for the issuance and renewal of vehicle
transporter certificates under this section to persons regularly engaged in businesses  that require
the certificates.
(3) Vehicle transporter certificates issued under this section are subject to all of the following:
(a) A certificate described in this  section is valid for a [ one-year] three-year  period and shall
be renewed as provided by the department.
(b) The department [ shall] may  not issue a certificate to a person until the  fee for issuance of
the certificate under ORS 822.700 is paid.
(4) The department may adopt necessary rules  for the administration of the laws relating to the
regulation of vehicle transporters,  the issuance and renewal of vehicle transporter certificates, the
issuance of vehicle transporter identification cards and the issuance of vehicle transporter plates.
The rules adopted under this subsection must be consistent with  any rules regarding vehicle trans-
porters that are adopted under ORS chapter 825. The rules may  include, but are not limited to,
grounds and procedures for the revocation, denial or suspension of  vehicle transporter certificates
and for placing vehicle transporters on probationary status.
(5) A person issued a certificate under this section is subject to  regulation under ORS chapter
825.
SECTION 31.
The amendments to ORS 822.310 by section 30 of this 2023 Act apply to ve-
hicle transporter  certificates and vehicle transporter plates issued on or after January 1,
2024. Vehicle  transporter certificates and vehicle  transporter plates issued before January
1, 2024, shall continue to be governed by ORS 822.310 as in effect immediately  before January
1, 2024.
SECTION 32.  ORS 822.315 is amended to read:
822.315. (1) A person commits the offense of improperly using  a vehicle transporter plate if the
person is the holder of a vehicle transporter certificate and the person does any of the following:
(a) Exercises privileges granted under ORS 822.310  for vehicles with special vehicle transporter
plates issued  under ORS 822.310 without conspicuously displaying the plates on the rear of each
vehicle.
(b) Uses a  special vehicle transporter plate to transport a manufactured structure to a situs not
permitted under the privileges granted under ORS 822.310.
(c) Allows any  person other than the transporter or transporter’s employee to use the special
vehicle transporter plates issued to the transporter under ORS 822.310.
(d) Uses the plate outside of the State of Oregon.
(2) The offense  described in this section, improper use of vehicle transporter plates, is a Class
D traffic violation.
SECTION 33.
The amendments to ORS 822.315 by section 32 of this  2023 Act apply to of-
fenses committed on or after the operative date specified in section 52 of this 2023 Act.
DRIVE TEST PROVIDERS
SECTION 34.  ORS 802.600 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 20
802.600. (1) The Department of Transportation may enter into  an agreement with any [person
who is not an employee  of the department, including but not limited to an integrator, enabling the
person] qualified provider to transact on behalf of the  department the following functions of the
department:
(a) Any vehicle-related transaction for which the department is responsible.
(b) Processing of fees or taxes for  a vehicle-related transaction for which the department is re-
sponsible.
(c) Written and skills testing  for driver licenses and permits, including commercial driver li-
censes.
(2) An agreement described in subsection (1) of this section  may be in any form and may contain
any provisions that the department determines to be in the best interests of the public and conven-
ient for the department,  including but not necessarily limited to provisions that allow the depart-
ment to:
(a) Ensure product quality control.
(b) Audit activities of the  [ person] qualified provider  entering into the agreement to ensure
compliance with the agreement.
(c) Impose sanctions on a [ person] qualified provider for violation of the agreement.
(3) A [ person] qualified provider authorized to transact business for the department under this
section,  including  but not limited to a [ person] qualified provider  who transacts business under
contract with an integrator, may charge a fee for the services provided. Fees authorized under  this
subsection are in addition to  any charges or fees that the department is authorized by statute to
collect for the transaction.
(4)(a) The department may adopt such rules as are necessary  to carry out the provisions of this
section, including but not limited to rules that:
(A) Specify criteria for eligibility of a [ person] qualified provider to enter  into an agreement
with the department under this section.
(B) Specify the manner in which fees authorized by this section will be collected  and establish
any notification the [ person] qualified provider is required to give the public about the fees.
(C) Require a bond in an amount determined by the department from a [ person] qualified pro-
vider acting under an agreement described in this section.
(D) Prohibit  disclosure of personal information from driver or vehicle records except in accord-
ance with applicable laws.
(b) The department may not adopt rules establishing  the amount of a fee to be charged by a
[person] qualified provider acting under this section.
(c) Rules adopted under this subsection shall be developed  in consultation with persons who
might enter into agreements with  the department under this section, including but not limited to
integrators and vehicle dealers.
(5) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Integrator” means a person  who enters into a contract with the Department of Transpor-
tation:
[(a)] (A)  To provide information and supplies  to a [ person] qualified provider  who transacts
business for the department under an agreement described in this section; and
[(b)] (B)  To collect moneys due from [ persons] qualified providers who transact the business
and remit the moneys to the department.
(b) “Qualified provider” means:
(A) Community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(B) Education service district; or
(C) Person who is not an employee of the department, including but not limited to  an
integrator.
REMOVAL OF PERSONAL PROPERTY
ON HIGHWAY RIGHT OF WAY
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 21
SECTION 35. (1) The Department of  Transportation may enter into an intergovernmental
agreement with a city that has a population of 500,000 or more for the removal,  storage and
disposition of personal property deposited, left or displayed on property  that is owned by the
department. The city shall prioritize removal of personal property that is  within the right
of way of a highway under  the jurisdiction of the department as a road authority pursuant
to ORS 810.010.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 377.650, 377.653  and 377.655, an intergovernmental agreement
entered into under this section may provide alternative provisions related to the removal,
storage and disposition of personal property if the alternative  provisions conform with the
requirements for  local government policy for removal of homeless individuals and personal
property under ORS 195.505.
(3) In addition to the requirements described in  subsection (2) of this section, an inter-
governmental agreement entered into under this section must include the following:
(a) Requirements for posting notice before the removal of personal property,  including
but not limited to the following:
(A) That the notice is created using durable materials and  securely posted within 30 feet
of the personal property to be removed;
(B) That the notice must provide the  date the notice begins and the date upon which the
city or department may begin removing personal property; and
(C) That the notice must provide a description of:
(i) How an individual may access personal property that is removed and stored; and
(ii) The length of time the city or department will store personal property before  the city
or department disposes of it.
(b) A requirement that the notice expires 10 days after the city or department posts  the
notice.
(c) A severe weather  protocol regarding the weather conditions under which the city or
department will not remove personal property.
(d) Provisions related to inventorying and storing the personal property to be removed.
(e) Provisions  related to the city or department relinquishing unclaimed personal prop-
erty after the storage period to the city’s or department’s designated agent.
(f) Provisions related  to when the city will provide impact reduction services, including
but not limited to trash collection.
(g) A provision providing that if the department requests  city services under the inter-
governmental agreement, but the city  is unable or unwilling to provide services as requested,
the department or the department’s  contractor may perform the requested services con-
sistent with the terms of the agreement, including but not limited to posting notice.
(4) The  72-hour notice under ORS 195.505 required under subsection (2) of this section
does not apply:
(a) When there are grounds for law enforcement  officials to believe that illegal activities
other than camping are occurring;
(b) Where there is an exceptional emergency, such as possible site  contamination by
hazardous materials; or
(c) When there is immediate danger to human life or safety.
(5) Before the city adopts an intergovernmental agreement under this section  or changes
to the agreement, the  city shall invite public comment on the proposed agreement or the
proposed changes to the agreement.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 36.
 ORS 87.152 is amended to read:
87.152. (1) Except as provided in  subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a person that makes,
alters, repairs, transports, stores, pastures, cares for, provides services for, supplies  materials for
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 22
or performs labor on a chattel at the request of the owner or lawful possessor  of the chattel has a
lien on the chattel in  the possession of the person for the reasonable or agreed charges for labor,
materials or services of the person, and the person may retain possession of the chattel until the
charges are paid.
(2)(a) Except  as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person may not create, attach, assert
or claim a possessory lien on a motor vehicle, as defined in ORS  801.360, unless the person performs
a service that  complies with ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495 and that involves making, altering, repairing,
transporting, storing, providing services for, supplying material for or performing labor in  con-
nection with the motor vehicle and the person:
(A) Is a franchised motor vehicle dealership, as defined in ORS 650.120 (5), or a  manufacturer,
as defined in ORS 650.120, of the motor vehicle;
(B) Holds a towing business certificate that the Department of  Transportation issued under ORS
822.205, provided that the person creates, attaches, asserts or  claims a possessory lien only for
transporting or storing the motor vehicle; or
(C) Creates, attaches, asserts or claims the lien against an abandoned motor vehicle.
(b) A person, other than a person that is described  in paragraph (a)(A), (B) or (C) of this sub-
section, shall have in effect a surety bond or irrevocable  letter of credit in the amount of $20,000
before, and shall maintain the surety  bond or irrevocable letter of credit during, any period in which
the person creates,  attaches, asserts or claims a possessory lien on a motor vehicle after making,
altering, repairing, transporting, storing, performing services for, supplying  materials for or per-
forming labor in connection with the motor vehicle.
(c)(A)  The  surety bond and the irrevocable letter of credit described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection must be issued,  respectively, by a corporate surety that is authorized to transact business
in this state and by a financial institution, as defined in ORS 706.008. The corporate surety  or the
financial institution, as appropriate,  shall notify the Department of Transportation of any cancella-
tion of the surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit.  The corporate surety remains liable under the
surety bond and the financial  institution remains obligated under the irrevocable letter of credit
until the  department receives the notice or until the date of cancellation specified in the notice,
whichever is later.
(B) A surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit described in paragraph (b) of  this subsection
must be:
(i) Executed to the State of Oregon;
(ii) Approved by the Attorney General as to form;
(iii) Filed with and held by the department; and
(iv) Conditioned such as to compensate parties damaged as a result of a use of a  possessory lien
in connection with a misrepresentation,  a fraud or a violation of a duty set forth in ORS 646A.480
to 646A.495.
(C) The person described in  paragraph (b) of this subsection as subject to the requirement to
have in effect a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit must certify in writing to the  department
each year that the surety  bond or irrevocable letter of credit remains in effect. If another person
obtains a recovery against the surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit,  the person shall file with
the department not later than three business days after the date  of the recovery a new surety bond
or irrevocable letter of credit in the amount specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3)(a) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Auction company” means an entity:
(i) That operates throughout the United States;
(ii) That holds a vehicle dealer certificate that the  Department of Transportation issued [ or re-
newed] under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040 ], or a dismantler certificate  that the department issued or
renewed under ORS 822.110 or 822.125; and
(iii) The primary activity of which, in this state, consists of disposing of totaled  motor vehicles.
(B) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 23
(b) An auction company has a lien on a motor  vehicle that the auction company possesses and
stored on premises the auction company owns or controls. The auction company may  title the motor
vehicle in the name of:
(A) The auction  company, if the motor vehicle has remained unclaimed on the auction company’s
premises for more than 30 days;
(B) The insurance company that directed the auction company to take possession of the  motor
vehicle; or
(C) An organization with an exemption from taxation under section  501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code that directed the auction company to take possession of the motor vehicle.
(c) ORS 87.166 and 87.172 to 87.212 do not apply to chattel that is subject to this subsection.
(4)(a) The owner  of a motor vehicle may bring an action to recover from a person that refuses,
at the owner’s demand and without a valid possessory lien created and attached as provided in
subsection (2) or  (3) of this section, to release the owner’s motor vehicle or restore to the owner
title to the owner’s motor vehicle if the person changed the title:
(A) The greater of $2,000 or an amount equivalent to twice the value of the motor  vehicle, up
to a maximum amount of $20,000; and
(B) The owner’s reasonable costs and attorney fees.
(b) In addition to the recovery described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the owner may
obtain:
(A) A judgment that:
(i) Directs the Department of Transportation to restore title  to the motor vehicle to the owner
and to invalidate the title the person obtained; or
(ii) Extinguishes the person’s interest in the motor vehicle and directs the  department to issue
title in the name of the plaintiff in the action;
(B) A judgment that declares that the person’s lien is invalid if the person obtained title to  the
motor vehicle without complying with this section; and
(C) Reimbursement for any fees the owner pays to the department to reissue the title.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 646A.090 is amended to read:
646A.090. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Buyer” means a person that purchases or leases a motor vehicle.
(b) “Final approval of funding” means a lender’s irrevocable  agreement to purchase a retail in-
stallment contract or lease agreement from a seller according to the exact terms that the seller and
buyer have negotiated.
(c) “Lender” means a person that purchases a retail installment contract or lease agreement  for
a motor vehicle.
(d) “Motor vehicle” means a  motor vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.360, that is sold or leased in
this state for personal, family or household purposes.
(e) “Seller” means a person that holds a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued  under
ORS 822.020 [ or renewed under ORS 822.040 ].
(2) A seller may offer to sell or lease a motor vehicle  to a buyer or prospective buyer under a
retail installment contract or lease  agreement that is subject to a lender’s agreement to purchase
the retail installment contract or lease agreement into which the buyer enters.
(3) In any transaction described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) If, within 14 days after a buyer takes possession of a motor  vehicle, a lender does not agree
to purchase a retail installment contract or lease agreement on the exact terms that the seller and
the buyer negotiate and the seller does not receive final approval of funding from the lender,  the
seller shall return to the buyer all items of value the  seller received from the buyer as part of the
transaction;  and
(b) If the  seller has accepted a trade-in motor vehicle from the buyer, the seller may not sell
or lease the buyer’s trade-in motor vehicle before the seller receives final approval  of funding from
the lender.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 24
(4) In any transaction described in subsection (2) of this section,  if the buyer has accepted a
motor vehicle from the seller that is subject to a retail installment contract or  lease agreement, and
a lender does not agree to purchase  the retail installment contract or lease agreement on the exact
terms the seller and the buyer negotiated, the  buyer shall return to the seller all items of value the
buyer received from  the seller as part of the transaction. The seller may charge the buyer only for
amounts that  the retail installment contract or lease agreement provides in writing that the seller
may charge. The retail installment contract or lease agreement may provide only for  these amounts:
(a) The fair market value of damage to,  excessive wear and tear on or loss of the motor vehicle
that occurs between the date the buyer  takes possession of the motor vehicle and the date the buyer
returns the motor vehicle to the seller’s custody; and
(b) If, within  14 days after the date on which the buyer takes possession of the motor vehicle,
the seller sends notice to the buyer by first class mail or written electronic communication that a
lender has not agreed to purchase the retail installment contract  or lease agreement, a reasonable
charge per mile  for the use of the motor vehicle. The charge may not exceed the rate per mile al-
lowed under federal law as a deduction for federal  income tax purposes for an ordinary and neces-
sary business expense.
(5) If the buyer makes a reasonable attempt to  return the vehicle within five days after the
seller sends a notice under subsection (4)(b) of this section, but the seller  is not available to accept
the return, the seller may not charge the buyer under subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(6)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this  subsection, a seller has an affirmative defense to a claim
or charge of violating subsection (3)(a) of this section by showing that the buyer  failed to return the
motor vehicle after the seller sent the notice described in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(b) A seller shall retain proof of the date on which the seller sent  to the buyer the notice de-
scribed in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 802.031 is amended to read:
802.031. (1) Nothing in ORS 802.600 prohibits the Department  of Transportation from adopting
rules to:
(a) Authorize persons to act as  agents for the department for the purpose of issuing winter re-
creation parking permits.
(b) Designate vehicle dealers holding a valid certificate issued under ORS 822.020  [ or 822.040]
to act as agents of the department for  purposes of accepting documents and fees necessary to title
and register any  vehicle the vehicle dealer sells, or to perform other duties the department may
authorize. Other duties may include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Issuing permits under ORS 803.600 and 803.625; and
(B) Performing vehicle identification number inspections.
(2) A vehicle dealer designated under this section shall:
(a) Transmit title and registration documents  with all required fees to the department within the
time specified in ORS 822.042 and in accordance  with any other applicable statutes or applicable
rules adopted by the department.
(b) Maintain  records as determined by the department to show compliance with this section and
any rules adopted by the department.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 803.552 is amended to read:
803.552. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Car rental company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 803.219.
(b) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
(2) If the Department of  Transportation receives an application for vehicle registration from a
car rental company that was submitted to an integrator and  the application does not include the
primary ownership record for the motor vehicle,  the department may issue registration plates for
the vehicle if the conditions described in subsection (3) of this section are met.
(3) Before the department may issue registration plates under subsection (2) of this section, a
car rental company must:
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 25
(a) Possess a valid Oregon vehicle dealer certificate issued [ or renewed ] under ORS 822.020 [ or
822.040];
(b) Certify that the car rental company has not received the primary ownership record  for the
vehicle as of the date the application is submitted; and
(c) Meet any other requirements adopted by the department by rule.
(4) In addition to any fee  for registration or issuance of registration plates, the department may
charge a fee for providing the services authorized by this section. The  department shall establish
the amount of the fee by rule.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 805.250 is amended to read:
805.250. This section establishes fees for issuance of registration plates authorized under  ORS
805.200. If a fee for plates authorized in ORS 805.200 is not established in this section, the fee is  the
same fee  as established under ORS 803.570.  Where  a fee is established under this section, the fee
is in addition to the fee established under ORS 803.570 unless otherwise provided in the following:
(1) Amateur radio operator registration plates issued under ORS 805.230, $5.
(2) Customized registration plates issued under ORS 805.240:
(a) For original issuance or renewal, $50 annual fee.
(b) For issuance of a duplicate  or replacement plate, $5 when the plate is issued at the time of
renewal of registration or $10 when the plate is issued at any other time.
(3) Special interest  registration plates approved under ORS 805.210 are approved without cost
except  as  provided in this subsection, including without payment of the fee established under ORS
803.570. If identifying stickers are required, $1 per sticker or pair of stickers.
(4) Dealer plates issued under ORS [ 822.020 and] 822.040 are as follows:
(a) For the original dealer plate, no fee except the fee established under ORS 803.570.
(b) For replacement dealer plates, $10 for each plate except that persons  dealing exclusively in
motorcycles, mopeds, snowmobiles  or any combination of those vehicles shall pay only $3 for each
replacement  plate.
(c) For additional plates, or for  renewal of registration, $42, except that persons dealing exclu-
sively in motorcycles, mopeds or snowmobiles or any  combination of those vehicles shall pay only
$9 for each additional plate, or for renewal of registration.
(5) Special vehicle transporter plates or devices issued under ORS 822.310, $5 for each  plate or
device.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 819.482 is amended to read:
819.482. (1) A person commits the offense of acting as  a vehicle appraiser without a certificate
if the person does not hold  a vehicle appraiser certificate issued under ORS 819.480 and the person,
for consideration, issues an opinion as to the value of a vehicle.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person who  holds a vehicle dealer certificate issued [ or renewed ] under ORS 822.020 [ or
822.040] and who appraises vehicles in the operation of the vehicle dealer’s business;
(b) A person from another jurisdiction  who holds a vehicle appraiser certificate requiring qual-
ifications substantially similar to qualifications  required for the certification of a vehicle appraiser
in this state;
(c) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business under ORS 744.515 or 744.521; or
(d) A person licensed or certified  to appraise real estate under ORS 674.310 and who appraises
the value of manufactured structures.
(3) The offense described in this section, acting as a vehicle appraiser without a certificate,  is
a Class A violation.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 822.015 is amended to read:
822.015. (1) In addition to any exemptions from  the vehicle code under ORS 801.026, ORS 822.005
does not apply to the following vehicles or persons:
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 26
(a) Road rollers, farm tractors, farm  trailers, trolleys, implements of husbandry, emergency ve-
hicles, well-drilling machinery and boat or  utility trailers with a gross weight of 1,800 pounds or
less.
(b) The owner of a vehicle as shown  by the vehicle title issued by any jurisdiction if the person
owned the  vehicle primarily for personal, family or household purposes. If the person has sold,
traded, displayed or offered for sale,  trade or exchange more than five vehicles in one calendar year,
the person shall have the burden of proving that the  person owned the vehicles primarily for per-
sonal, family or household  purposes or for other purposes that the Department of Transportation,
by rule, defines as constituting an exemption under this section.
(c) A receiver,  trustee, personal representative or public officer while performing any official
duties.
(d) The lessor or security interest holder of a vehicle as shown by the vehicle title issued by
any jurisdiction.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a manufacturer who sells vehicles the man-
ufacturer has manufactured in Oregon. Nothing in this paragraph prevents  any manufacturer from
obtaining a vehicle dealer certificate  under ORS 822.020. This paragraph does not exempt a man-
ufacturer who sells or trades campers or travel trailers.
(f) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business  under ORS 744.515 or 744.521 who is dis-
posing of vehicles for salvage.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a person who sells or  trades or offers to sell
or trade  a vehicle that has been used in the operation of the person’s business. This paragraph does
not exempt a person who is in the business of  selling, trading, displaying, rebuilding, renting or
leasing vehicles from any requirement to obtain a certificate for dealing in those vehicles.
(h) A person who receives no money, goods or services, either directly or indirectly,  for dis-
playing a vehicle or acting as an agent in the buying or selling of a vehicle.
(i) A person who collects, purchases, acquires, trades or disposes of vehicles and vehicle parts
for the person’s own  use in order to preserve, restore and maintain vehicles for the person’s own
use or for hobby or historical purposes.
(j) A manufactured structure dealer subject to the  licensing requirement of ORS 446.671 or a
person exempt from licensing under ORS 446.676 when selling a vehicle, trailer or  semitrailer ac-
cepted in trade as part of  a manufactured structure transaction. A manufactured structure dealer-
ship or exempt person may not directly sell more than three vehicles per  calendar year under
authority of this paragraph, but by consignment with a dealer certified  under ORS 822.020 [ or
822.040] may sell an unlimited number of vehicles acquired as described in this paragraph.
(k) A lien claimant who sells vehicles in order to foreclose possessory liens.
(L) A lien claimant who, in a 12-month period, sells 12 or fewer  vehicles that the lien claimant
acquired through possessory liens if the  vehicles are sold at the business location of the lien
claimant.
(m) Electric personal assistive mobility devices.
(n) A tower that received title for a vehicle under ORS 822.235.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 822.005, the  following may participate with other dealers in a display
of vehicles, including but not limited to an auto show, if the display is an event that lasts for 10 days
or less and is an event for which the public is charged admission:
(a) A person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction; or
(b) Any employee of a person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 822.005,  a person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another juris-
diction or an employee of a person who is certified  or licensed as a vehicle dealer may participate
in a vehicle auction if the vehicle auction is:
(a) Conducted by a vehicle dealer who holds a vehicle dealer certificate issued  [ or renewed ]
under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040]; and
(b) Open only to certified or licensed vehicle dealers or their employees.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 27
(4) The department shall  adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section, including but
not limited to specifying which dealers may take vehicles on consignment from other jurisdictions.
SECTION 43.  ORS 822.025 is amended to read:
822.025. An application  for a vehicle dealer certificate issued by the Department of Transpor-
tation under ORS 822.020 shall be in a form prescribed by the department and shall  contain all of
the following:
(1) The names and residence addresses of the persons applying, as follows:
(a) If the applicant is a firm  or partnership, the name of the firm or partnership with the names
and residence addresses of all members thereof.
(b) If the applicant is a corporation, the name of  the corporation with the names of the principal
officers and their residence addresses and the name of the  state under whose laws the corporation
is organized.
(2) The name under which the business will be conducted.
(3) The street address, including city and county in Oregon, where  the business will be con-
ducted.
(4) Whether or not used vehicles are handled.
(5) A certificate from the applicant showing that  the applicant will act as a vehicle dealer and
will conduct business at the location given on the application.
(6) A certificate signed by a person authorized by  the local governing body to do so, stating that
the location of the business as given in the application for a certificate complies with any land  use
ordinances or business regulatory ordinances of the  city or county. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to renewal of a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS [ 822.040] 822.020 unless  the lo-
cation of the business is being changed at the time of renewal.
(7) Any information required by the department to efficiently administer  the registration of ve-
hicles and regulation of dealers or other relevant information required by the department.
(8) If the applicant is a dealer subject to  the education and test requirements under ORS 822.027
(1)(a), a certificate from the provider of each precertification education program listing  the courses
that the applicant  has completed and the tests that the applicant has passed in the precertification
education program.
(9) If the applicant will offer new recreational vehicles for sale,  a certificate from the applicant
stating that the applicant will maintain a recreational  vehicle service facility at the street address
provided by the applicant pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 822.027 is amended to read:
822.027. (1) Except as provided in  subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following education
requirements apply to an applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040]:
(a) An applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 must complete a  minimum
of eight hours of  courses in any approved precertification education program described in subsection
(4) of this section and pass the tests required under paragraph (c) of this subsection within  one year
prior to submitting an application for the certificate;
(b) An applicant for a renewal certificate under ORS [ 822.040] 822.020 must, for each year of a
certification  period,  complete a minimum of four hours of courses in any approved continuing edu-
cation program described in subsection (4) of this section and pass the tests required under para-
graph (c) of this subsection prior to submitting an application for  the renewal certificate. An
applicant may  not repeat a course in an approved continuing education program for which the ap-
plicant previously obtained credit within the same certification period; and
(c) For each course hour required under  paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the provider
shall administer a test and the applicant must pass each test with a score of at least  70 percent in
order to receive credit for the course hour. Each test must contain at least 10 questions.
(2) The precertification education requirements in subsection (1)(a)  of this section do not apply
to an applicant for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040] if, at the time of ap-
plication, the applicant holds another certificate issued under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040].
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 28
(3) The continuing education requirements of subsection (1)(b) of this  section do not apply to
an applicant for renewal of a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS [ 822.040] 822.020 if the applicant
is:
(a) A dealer having  a franchise in this state for nationally advertised and recognized motor ve-
hicles;
(b) A dealer having a franchise in this state for new recreational vehicles;
(c) A motor vehicle rental company having a national franchise under  the ownership of a cor-
poration that operates throughout the United States; or
(d) A national auction company that holds  a vehicle dealer certificate and a dismantler certif-
icate whose primary activity in this state is the sale or disposition of totaled vehicles.
(4) Precertification and continuing education programs and the tests required in subsection  (1)
of this  section may be developed by any motor vehicle industry organization including, but not lim-
ited to, the Oregon  Independent Auto Dealers Association. Each education program shall be sub-
mitted to the advisory committee established  under ORS 802.370 for approval every two years. The
committee shall vote  to approve or deny approval of each program. A program that is approved must
cover state and federal law in at least the following areas:
(a) Motor vehicle advertising;
(b) Odometer laws and regulations;
(c) Vehicle licensing and registration;
(d) Unlawful dealer activities;
(e) Environmental rules and regulations;
(f) Oregon and industry standard motor vehicle forms;
(g) Truthful lending practices;
(h) Motor vehicle financing;
(i) Service and warranty contracts; and
(j) Land use regulations governing motor vehicle dealers.
(5) Precertification and continuing education programs required in  subsection (1) of this section
may be provided by accredited educational institutions, private vocational  schools, correspondence
schools or trade  associations if the education programs have been approved by the advisory com-
mittee established under ORS 802.370 as required in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The approval of an education program under subsection  (4) of this section expires two years
from the date of the approval.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 822.030 is amended to read:
822.030. (1) A  bond or letter of credit required to qualify for a vehicle dealer certificate under
ORS 822.020 [ or to qualify for renewal of a certificate under ORS 822.040 ] must comply with  all of
the following:
(a) The bond shall have a corporate surety licensed to do business within this  state. A letter
of credit shall  be an irrevocable letter of credit issued by an insured institution, as defined in ORS
706.008. The surety or institution shall notify the Department of Transportation if the bond  or letter
of credit is canceled for any reason. The surety or institution shall  continue to be liable under the
bond or letter of credit until the department receives the notice required by this paragraph,  or until
the cancellation date specified in the notice, whichever is later.
(b) The bond or letter of credit shall be executed to the State of Oregon.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the bond or letter of credit  shall be in the
following sum:
(A) If the person holds a certificate to be a dealer exclusively in motorcycles, mopeds,  Class I
all-terrain vehicles or snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles, the bond  or letter of credit
shall be for $10,000.
(B) Except as provided  in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, if the applicant is seeking a cer-
tificate to be a vehicle dealer, the bond or letter of credit  shall be for $50,000 for each year the
certificate is valid.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 29
(d) The bond or letter of credit described in  this subsection shall be approved as to form by the
Attorney  General.
(e) The bond or letter  of credit must be conditioned that the person issued the certificate shall
conduct business as a vehicle dealer without fraud or fraudulent representation and without  violat-
ing any provisions of the vehicle  code relating to vehicle registration, vehicle permits, the transfer
or alteration of vehicles or the regulation of vehicle dealers.
(f) The bond or letter of credit must be filed and held in the office of the department.
(g) The vehicle dealer shall purchase a bond or letter of credit under this  subsection annually
on or before each anniversary of the issuance of the vehicle dealer’s certificate.
(2) Any person  shall have a right of action against a vehicle dealer, against the surety on the
vehicle dealer’s bond and against the letter of credit in the person’s  own name if the person suffers
any loss or damage by reason of the vehicle dealer’s fraud, fraudulent representations or violations
of provisions of the vehicle code relating to:
(a) Vehicle registration;
(b) Vehicle permits;
(c) The transfer or alteration of vehicles; or
(d) The regulation of vehicle dealers.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the maximum amount available  under a bond
or letter of credit described in subsection (1)(c)(B) of  this section for the payment of claims to per-
sons other than retail customers of the dealer is $10,000.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of  this section, a person other than a retail customer of the
vehicle dealer may not make a claim under subsection (2) of  this section against the surety on the
vehicle dealer’s bond,  or against the vehicle dealer’s letter of credit, if the vehicle dealer holds a
vehicle dealer certificate to deal exclusively in motorcycles, mopeds, Class I all-terrain  vehicles or
snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles.
(5) If the certificate of a vehicle dealer is not renewed or is  voluntarily or involuntarily can-
celed, the sureties  on the bond and the issuer of the letter of credit are relieved from liability that
accrues after the department cancels the certificate.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 822.033 is amended to read:
822.033. A  certificate of insurance required to qualify for a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS
822.020 or to qualify for renewal of  a certificate under ORS [ 822.040] 822.020 must comply with all
of the following:
(1) The certificate shall:
(a) Be issued by an insurance carrier licensed to do business within this state;
(b) Show that the dealer is  insured by a policy that provides the minimum limits of coverage
required under ORS 806.070;
(c) Show that the dealer  is insured by a policy that provides for payment of judgments of the
type described in ORS 806.040;
(d) Show that the dealer  is insured by a policy covering all vehicles manufactured, owned, op-
erated, used or maintained by or under the control of the dealer;
(e) Show that the dealer is insured by a policy that also covers all other  persons who, with the
consent  of  the dealer, use or operate vehicles manufactured, owned or maintained by or under the
control of the dealer;
(f) Be dated as of the date of the motor vehicle policy for which it is given;
(g) Contain the policy number; and
(h) Provide that the insurer shall give the Department of Transportation written notice of any
cancellation of the policy and that the insurer shall continue to be  liable under the policy until the
department receives the  notice required by this paragraph or until the cancellation date specified
in the notice, whichever is later.
(2) The certificate of insurance must be filed and held in the office of the department.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 30
(3) A dealer is exempt from  the requirement to file the certificate of insurance described in this
section if the dealer certifies,  in such form as may be required by the department, that the dealer
will be dealing exclusively in one or more of the following:
(a) Antique vehicles issued permanent registration under ORS 805.010;
(b) Farm trailers;
(c) Farm tractors;
(d) Implements of husbandry; or
(e) Snowmobiles, Class I or Class III all-terrain vehicles.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 822.045 is amended to read:
822.045. (1) A vehicle dealer  improperly conducts a vehicle dealer business and is subject to the
penalties under this section if the vehicle dealer commits any of the following offenses:
(a) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of failure  to obtain a supplemental vehicle dealer cer-
tificate if the vehicle  dealer opens any additional place of business using the same business name
as a place of business approved under a vehicle dealer certificate without first obtaining a  supple-
mental dealer certificate under ORS 822.040.
(b) A vehicle  dealer commits the offense of failure to obtain a corrected vehicle dealer certif-
icate  if  the dealer moves a place of business or changes the business name without first obtaining
a corrected dealer certificate under ORS 822.040.
(c) A vehicle dealer commits  the offense of failure to maintain proper vehicle dealer records if
the dealer does not keep records or books with all of the following information concerning any  used
or secondhand vehicles or campers the dealer deals with:
(A) A record of the purchase, sale or exchange or of the dealer’s receipt for purpose of sale.
(B) A description of the vehicle or camper.
(C) The name and address of the seller, the purchaser and the alleged owner or other person
from whom the vehicle or camper was purchased or received or to whom it was sold or delivered.
(D) For motor vehicles, the vehicle identification number and any  other numbers or identifica-
tion marks as may be thereon and a statement that a number  has been obliterated, defaced or
changed, if such is a fact.
(E) For trailers and campers, the vehicle identification number and  any other numbers or iden-
tification marks as may be thereon.
(F) A duly assigned certificate  of title or other primary ownership record or a bill of sale from
the registered owner of the vehicle or camper from the time of delivery to the dealer until the dealer
disposes of the vehicle or camper. If title is issued for the vehicle in a form other than a certificate,
or if the primary ownership record is in a form other than a document, a dealer shall keep records
in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Transportation for the purpose of complying
with this subparagraph.
(d) A vehicle dealer commits the  offense of failure to allow administrative inspection if the
dealer refuses to allow the department to conduct an inspection  under ORS 822.035 at any time
during normal business hours.
(e) A vehicle dealer  commits the offense of failure to allow police inspection if the dealer refuses
to allow any police officer to conduct an inspection under ORS 810.480 at any time during  normal
business hours.
(f) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of illegal use of dealer  vehicle for hire if the dealer
allows any vehicle operated under vehicle dealer registration  to be loaned or rented with or without
driver for hire or direct compensation.
(g) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of improper use of dealer  plates or devices if the dealer
or employee of the dealer causes or permits the display or use of any special vehicle dealer  regis-
tration plate or device on any vehicle not owned or controlled by the dealer.
(h) A person commits the offense of improper display  of dealer plates if the person operates over
and along the highways of this state any unregistered vehicle owned  or controlled by the dealer and
any dealer  plates issued are not displayed in the manner provided in ORS 803.540 for the display
of registration plates.
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 31
(i) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of failure to exhibit  the dealer certificate if the dealer
fails to permanently exhibit the  certificate at the place of business of the person at all times while
the certificate is in force.
(j) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a vehicle dealer commits the  offense of
failure to provide clear title if:
(A) Within 15 days of transfer of any interest in a vehicle or camper to the dealer  by a con-
sumer, the dealer fails to satisfy:
(i) The interest of any person from whom the dealer  purchased or obtained the vehicle or
camper;
(ii) The interest of any person from whom the person described  in sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph leased the vehicle or camper; and
(iii) All security interests in the vehicle or camper entered into prior to the time of transfer.
(B) Within 15 days  of receiving clear title to a vehicle or camper from another dealer, the pur-
chasing dealer fails to satisfy the  interest of the dealer from which the purchasing dealer received
the certificate of title  or other primary ownership document. For purposes of this subparagraph, a
purchasing dealer receives a certificate of title or other  primary ownership document from a dealer
on the date:
(i) The purchasing dealer or the Department of Transportation takes physical  possession of the
certificate or document; or
(ii) A written notice is mailed by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested,  to the
purchasing dealer from the dealer, stating  that the certificate or document is available to be picked
up at a place and time prearranged by both parties. The written notice  must be mailed to a business
address of the purchasing dealer that is on file with the  department. Service by mail under this
sub-subparagraph is effective on the date of mailing.
(k) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, a vehicle dealer commits the offense of
failure to furnish certificate of title or application for title if, within 90 calendar days of transfer
of any interest in a vehicle or camper by the dealer, the dealer has failed to:
(A) Furnish the certificate of title or other primary ownership record for  the vehicle or camper
and any release  thereon or, if title has been issued or is to be issued in a form other than a certif-
icate, any information or documents required  by rule of the department, to the security interest
holder next named, if any, otherwise to the lessor or, if none, to the purchaser; or
(B) Submit to the department in a manner that complies with any  applicable statutes and rules,
an application for title on behalf of the  person to whom the title is to be furnished or whose name
is to be shown on the title record.
(L) A vehicle dealer  commits the offense of failure to maintain bond or letter of credit coverage
if the dealer permits a bond or letter of credit to lapse during the period that the bond or letter of
credit is required under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040] or if the dealer fails to  purchase a bond or letter
of credit required by ORS 822.030.
(m) A person commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer  while under revocation, cancel-
lation or suspension if the person conducts business as a vehicle dealer in this state and the person’s
vehicle dealer certificate is revoked, canceled or  suspended, regardless of whether the person is li-
censed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction. This  paragraph does not apply if the person has
other current, valid dealer certificates issued in this state.
(n) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of improper  display of a vehicle for advertising pur-
poses if  the dealer displays a vehicle at a location other than the dealer’s place of business for the
purpose of advertising and the dealer does not comply with the provisions of ORS 822.040 (4).
(2) A dealer is not considered to have committed the offense described in subsection (1)(j)(A) of
this section if the dealer fails to satisfy an interest in a vehicle or camper that  arises from an in-
ventory financing security interest for which the dealer is the debtor.
(3) A  dealer is not considered to have committed the offense described in subsection (1)(k) of this
section if the dealer demonstrates that:
(a) The dealer has made a good faith effort to comply; and
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 32
(b) The dealer’s inability to provide title is due to circumstances beyond the dealer’s control.
(4) The offenses described in this section are subject to the following penalties:
(a) The offense described in this section, failure to obtain a supplemental vehicle dealer  certif-
icate, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) The offense described in this section, failure to  obtain a corrected vehicle dealer certificate,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense described in this section, failure to maintain  proper vehicle dealer records, is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(d) The  offense described in this section, failure to allow administrative inspection, is a Class
A misdemeanor.
(e) The offense described in  this section, failure to allow police inspection, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(f) The offense described in this section, illegal use of dealer vehicle  for hire, is a Class B traffic
violation.
(g) The offense described in this section, improper  use of dealer plates or devices, is a Class D
traffic violation.
(h) The  offense described in this section, improper display of dealer plates, is a Class B traffic
violation.
(i) The offense described in  this section, failure to exhibit the dealer certificate, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(j) The offense described in this section, failure to provide clear title, is a Class A  misdemeanor.
(k) The offense described in this section, failure to furnish certificate  of title or application for
title, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(L) The  offense described in this section, failure to maintain bond or letter of credit coverage,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(m) The offense described in  this section, acting as a vehicle dealer while under revocation,
cancellation or suspension, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(n) The offense described in this section, improper display of a  vehicle for advertising purposes,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 822.060 is amended to read:
822.060. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person who holds a  vehicle
dealer certificate issued [ or renewed ] under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040] commits the offense of  illegal
consignment practices if the person does any of the following:
(a) Takes a vehicle on consignment from a person who does not hold a vehicle  dealer certificate
issued [ or renewed ] under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040 ], or who  is not licensed as a vehicle dealer in
another jurisdiction, and who does not have proof that the consignor  is the registered owner, a se-
curity interest holder or lessor of the vehicle.
(b) Takes a  vehicle on consignment from a security interest holder without the security interest
holder first completing a repossession action prior to  consigning the vehicle and providing the
dealer with proper documentary proof of the repossession action.
(c) Takes a vehicle on consignment and does not have the terms of  the consignment agreement
in writing  and provide a copy of the agreement to the consignor. The agreement shall include a
provision stating that if the terms  of the agreement are not met, the consignor may file a complaint
in writing with the Department of Transportation, Salem, Oregon.
(d) Sells a vehicle that the dealer has on consignment and does not pay the consignor  within
10 days of the sale.
(e) Sells a vehicle that the dealer has on consignment and does not  either provide the purchaser
with a certificate of  title to the vehicle or with other primary ownership records in the form of
documents or apply to the department in the  purchaser’s name for title to the vehicle within 30 days
of the sale in a manner provided by the department by rule.
(f) Does not allow the department or  any duly authorized representative to inspect and audit
any records of any  separate accounts into which the dealer deposits any funds received or handled
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 33
by the dealer or in the course of business  as a dealer from consignment sale of vehicles at such
times as the department may direct.
(g) Takes any part of any money paid to the dealer in connection  with any consignment trans-
action as part or all  of the dealer’s commission or fee until the transaction has been completed or
terminated.
(h) Does not make  arrangement for the disposition of money from a consignment transaction
with the seller at the time of establishing a consignment agreement.
(i) Sells a vehicle that the dealer has taken on consignment without first giving the purchaser
the following disclosure in writing:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
DISCLOSURE REGARDING
CONSIGNMENT SALE
 (Name  of Dealer) is selling the following described vehicle:
 (Year)  (Make)  (Model)  (Vehicle  Identification Num-
ber) on consignment.
[ ] There is a security interest in this vehicle.
[ ] There is not a security interest in this vehicle.
YOU SHOULD TAKE ACTION TO ENSURE THAT ANY SECURITY  INTERESTS ARE RE-
LEASED AND THAT THE TITLE TO THE VEHICLE IS TRANSFERRED TO YOU. OTHERWISE,
YOU MAY TAKE TITLE SUBJECT TO ANY UNSATISFIED SECURITY INTERESTS.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) The offense described in this section does not apply if the person takes a  vehicle on
consignment from an entity other than a retail customer and the person holds a vehicle dealer cer-
tificate issued [ or renewed ] under ORS 822.020 [ or 822.040] and operates a:
(a) Wholesale vehicle auction company; or
(b) National auction company  whose primary activity in this state is the sale or disposition of
totaled  vehicles.
(3) The offense described in this section, illegal  consignment practices, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this  section, including but
not limited to rules to  specify which persons may take and sell vehicles on consignment and to
regulate the taking and selling of vehicles on consignment from other jurisdictions.
GENERAL REPEALS
SECTION 49.
ORS 805.242 is repealed.
SECTION 50. ORS 805.117 is repealed.
SECTION 51. The repeal of ORS 805.117 by  section 50 of this 2023 Act applies to regis-
tration plates issued,  renewed or replaced on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
Consular corps registration plates issued before the effective date of  this 2023 Act shall
continue to be governed by ORS 805.117 as in effect immediately before the  effective date of
this 2023 Act.
DELAYED OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 52. (1) The amendments to  ORS 87.152, 319.550, 319.520, 319.530, 646A.090,
802.031, 803.530, 803.552, 805.103, 805.210, 805.250, 807.080, 819.482,  822.015, 822.020, 822.025,
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 34
822.027, 822.030, 822.033, 822.035,  822.040, 822.045, 822.050, 822.060, 822.310, 822.315, 822.515,
822.700 and 822.990 by sections 3 to 5, 9, 16 to 22,  26 to 28, 30, 32 and 36 to 48 of this 2023 Act
and the repeal of ORS 805.242, 822.505, 822.510, 822.520, 822.525, 822.530 and 822.535 by sections
25 and 49 of this 2023 Act become operative January 1, 2024.
(2) The Department of  Transportation may adopt rules or take any actions before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that are necessary to enable the
department, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  to
carry out the amendments to ORS 87.152, 319.550, 319.520, 319.530, 646A.090, 802.031,  803.530,
803.552, 805.103, 805.210, 805.250,  807.080, 819.482, 822.015, 822.020, 822.025, 822.027, 822.030,
822.033, 822.035, 822.040, 822.045, 822.050, 822.060, 822.310, 822.315, 822.515, 822.700  and 822.990
by sections 3 to 5, 9, 16 to 22, 26  to 28, 30, 32 and 36 to 48 of this 2023 Act and the repeal of
ORS 805.242, 822.505, 822.510, 822.520, 822.525, 822.530 and 822.535 by sections 25 and 49 of this
2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 53.
The unit captions  used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 54. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House May 31, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2099 (HB 2099-A) Page 35